Maryland, session 2026, HB1068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1316.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1068*

HOUSE BILL 1068
(2) “Dependent” means an individual who is or who may become eligible
for coverage under the terms of a health benefit plan because of a relationship with another
individual.
(3) “EMPLOYER–SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 15–1104(A) OF THIS TITLE.
[(3)] (4) “Health care practitioner” has the meaning stated in § 1–301 of
the Health Occupations Article.
[(4)] (5) “Qualifying coverage in an eligible employer–sponsored plan”
has the meaning stated in 45 C.F.R. § 155.300.
(6) “SMALL EMPLOYER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 31–101(AA)
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(c) A carrier participating in the Individual Exchange shall provide:
(1) the special enrollment periods specified in 45 C.F.R. § 155.420 for
individuals who purchase coverage through the Individual Exchange; [and]
(2) a special enrollment period for an individual who purchases coverage
through the Individual Exchange if the individual or a dependent of the individual becomes
pregnant, as confirmed by a health care practitioner; AND
(3) A SPECIAL ENROLLMENT PERIOD FOR:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
1. PURCHASES COVERAGE THROUGH THE INDIVIDUAL
EXCHANGE BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BECOME EMPLOYED TO WORK A
MINIMUM OF 30 HOURS PER WEEK BY A SMALL EMPLOYER THAT DOES NOT OFFER
AN EMPLOYER–SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN; AND
2. PROVIDES THE INDIVIDUAL EXCHANGE WITH A FORM
DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSIONER AND COMPLETED BY THE EMPLOYER THAT
INDICATES:
A. THE FIRST DAY OF EMPLOYMENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
AND
B. THAT THE INDIVIDUAL WAS HIRED TO WORK A
MINIMUM OF 30 HOURS PER WEEK; AND

HOUSE BILL 1068 3
(II) EACH DEPENDENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM
(I) OF THIS ITEM.
(d) A carrier shall provide:
(1) the special enrollment periods specified in 45 C.F.R. § 147.104(b)(2) for
individuals who purchase coverage outside the Individual Exchange; [and]
(2) a special enrollment period for an individual who purchases coverage
outside the Individual Exchange if the individual or a dependent of the individual becomes
pregnant, as confirmed by a health care practitioner; AND
(3) A SPECIAL ENROLLMENT PERIOD FOR:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
1. PURCHASES COVERAGE OUTSIDE THE INDIVIDUAL
EXCHANGE BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BECOME EMPLOYED TO WORK A
MINIMUM OF 30 HOURS PER WEEK BY A SMALL EMPLOYER THAT DOES NOT OFFER
AN EMPLOYER–SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN; AND
2. PROVIDES THE CARRIER WITH A FORM DEVELOPED
BY THE COMMISSIONER AND COMPLETED BY THE EMPLOYER THAT INDICATES:
A. THE FIRST DAY OF EMPLOYMENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
AND
B. THAT THE INDIVIDUAL WAS HIRED TO WORK A
MINIMUM OF 30 HOURS PER WEEK; AND
(II) EACH DEPENDENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM
(I) OF THIS ITEM.
(e) (1) A special enrollment period described in subsection (c)(2) or (d)(2) of this
section shall:
[(1)] (I) be open for a period of 90 days; and
[(2)] (II) begin on the date the health care practitioner confirms the
pregnancy.
(2) A SPECIAL ENROLLMENT PERIOD DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(C)(3) OR (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) BE OPEN FOR A PERIOD OF 60 DAYS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1068
(II) BEGIN ON THE FIRST DAY OF EMPLOYMENT OF THE
INDIVIDUAL BY A SMALL EMPLOYER THAT DOES NOT OFFER AN
EMPLOYER–SPONSORED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN AS INDICATED ON THE FORM
DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSIONER, COMPLETED BY THE EMPLOYER, AND
PROVIDED TO THE INDIVIDUAL EXCHANGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(C)(3)(I)2 OF THIS SECTION OR THE CARRIER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(D)(3)(I)2 OF THIS SECTION, AS APPLICABLE.
(f) (1) If an individual enrolls for coverage during one of the open enrollment
periods described in subsection (b) of this section or during one of the special open
enrollment periods described in subsections (c)(1) and (d)(1) of this section, coverage shall
be effective in accordance with the requirements in 45 C.F.R. § 155.420.
(2) If an individual enrolls for coverage or enrolls a dependent for coverage
during a special enrollment period described in subsection (c)(2) or (d)(2) of this section, the
coverage shall become effective on the first day of the month in which the individual
receives confirmation of pregnancy.
(3) IF AN INDIVIDUAL ENROLLS FOR COVERAGE OR ENROLLS A
DEPENDENT FOR COVERAGE DURING A SPECIAL ENROLLMENT PERIOD DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (C)(3) OR (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION, THE COVERAGE SHALL BECOME
EFFECTIVE ON THE FIRST DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING THE DATE OF PLAN
SELECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.